Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB747.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 514 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person is guilty of fraudulent sale or lease of real property located within this
Commonwealth when he or she knowingly lists or advertises, either within or
outside this Commonwealth, residential real property or a commercial building
for sale, lease, or rent without legal title or authority that results in any pecuniary
loss to an individual in this Commonwealth.
(2) Fraudulent sale or lease of real property is a Class D felony for the first offense
and a Class C felony for each subsequent offense.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:54 PM Jacketed